Illinois, session 104th, SB127.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Governmental Ethics Act is amended 5by changing Section 2-101 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 420/2-101)  (from Ch. 127, par. 602-101)7    Sec. 2-101. Government official lobbying. 8    (a) No legislator may engage in promoting or opposing in 9any manner the passage by the General Assembly of any 10legislative matter affecting the interests of any individual, 11association, or corporation as distinct from those of the 12people of the State as a whole, if he or she accepts 13compensation specifically attributable to such lobbying, other 14than that provided by law for members of the General Assembly. 15Nothing in this Section prohibits a legislator from lobbying 16without compensation.17    No legislator shall engage in compensated lobbying of the 18governing body of a municipality, county, or township, or an 19official thereof, or the executive branch of the State of 20Illinois, or an official thereof. 21    No legislator or executive branch constitutional officer 22shall engage in compensated lobbying of the governing body of 23a municipality, county, or township, or an official thereof,   SB0127- 2 -LRB104 08025 JDS 18071 b1on behalf of any lobbyist or lobbying entity that is 2registered to lobby the General Assembly or the executive 3branch of the State of Illinois. 4    (b) No elected or appointed county executive or 5legislative official shall engage in compensated lobbying of 6the governing body of a county, municipality, township, the 7General Assembly, a State executive branch office or agency, 8or an official thereof, on behalf of any lobbyist or lobbying 9entity that is registered to lobby the county in which the 10official is elected or appointed.11    (c) No elected or appointed municipal executive or 12legislative official shall engage in compensated lobbying of 13the governing body of a county, municipality, township, the 14General Assembly, a State executive branch office or agency, 15or an official thereof, on behalf of any lobbyist or lobbying 16entity that is registered to lobby the municipality in which 17the official is elected or appointed. 18    (d) No elected or appointed township executive or 19legislative official shall engage in compensated lobbying of 20the governing body of a county, municipality, township, the 21General Assembly, a State executive branch office or agency, 22or an official thereof, on behalf of any lobbyist or lobbying 23entity that is registered to lobby the township in which the 24official is elected or appointed. 25    (e) No elected or appointed municipal executive or 26legislative official shall engage in compensated lobbying of   SB0127- 3 -LRB104 08025 JDS 18071 b1the governing body of a county, municipality, or township, the 2General Assembly, a State executive branch office or agency, 3or an official thereof, on behalf of any lobbyist or lobbying 4entity if the person is an elected or appointed municipal 5executive or legislative official from a municipality exempted 6by the preemption provision of Section 11.2 of the Lobbyist 7Registration Act. 8    (f) A violation of this Section shall constitute a Class A 9misdemeanor.10(Source: P.A. 102-664, eff. 1-1-22.) 11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 12becoming law.